Massachusetts, session 194th, H1291.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 1. Notwithstanding the provisions of 101 CMR 314 or any general or special law
to the contrary, Section 75 of Chapter 260 of the Acts of 2020 is hereby amended throughout by
inserting after the words “health care provider” in each place where it appears, and by inserting
in place thereof the following: --
; provided, however, that the provisions of this section shall not apply to any provider
licensed to practice dentistry.
of 1